Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 1
FAMILY RESOURCE CENTERS

26.5-3-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that Colorado needs healthy and cohesive families at all income levels in order for the state to be economically viable. A number of families in communities throughout Colorado temporarily may not have access to the basic necessities of life or to resources or services designed to promote individual development and family growth.

The general assembly further declares that many of Colorado's vulnerable families, individuals, children, and youth do not necessarily live in at-risk neighborhoods. These persons may not have appropriate resources or sufficient income for adequate housing, health care, or child care because the primary wage earners are unemployed or underemployed or work at jobs that pay minimum wage or less. Further, many of these persons not only live in poverty but also experience divorce or domestic violence or are single parents. Children and youth who are raised in vulnerable families experience an increased risk of being abused, being illiterate, being undereducated, dropping out of school, becoming teen parents, abusing drugs, and engaging in at-risk behaviors, including but not limited to criminal activities. These children and youth are often influenced by and likely to repeat behaviors that began with their parents.

Therefore, the general assembly finds that it is appropriate to establish a program to provide family resource centers in communities to serve as a single point of entry for providing comprehensive, intensive, integrated, and collaborative state and community-based services to vulnerable families, individuals, children, and youth.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 601, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-18-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-102. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"At-risk neighborhood" means an urban or rural neighborhood or community in which there are incidences of poverty, unemployment and underemployment, substance abuse, crime, school dropouts, illiteracy, teen pregnancies and teen parents, domestic violence, or other conditions that put families at risk.

"Case management" means the process through which a family advocate for the family resource center assesses a family's need for services as provided in section 26.5-3-103 (2).

"Community applicant" means a local entity that is interested and willing to commit private and public resources to establish a family resource center and that applies for a family resource center grant pursuant to section 26.5-3-104. "Community applicant" includes, but is not limited to, a state or local governmental agency or governing body, a local private nonprofit agency, a local board of education on a cost-shared basis, a local recreational center, or a local child care agency.

"Family resource center" means a unified single point of entry where vulnerable families, individuals, children, and youth in communities or within at-risk neighborhoods or participants in Colorado works, pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of title 26, can obtain information, assessment of needs, and referral for delivery of family services described in section 26.5-3-103 (2) and for which a grant is awarded to a community applicant pursuant to section 26.5-3-104.

"Family support and parent education" means a program or service that promotes a family's positive and meaningful engagement in its children's lives by providing an experiential and supportive adult learning environment through which a primary caregiver can learn how to create a safe, stable, and supportive family unit.

"Local advisory council" means the body that oversees the operation of the family resource center as described in section 26.5-3-104 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 601, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-18-102 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-103. Program created - repeal.

There is established in the department a family resource center program. The purposes of the program are to provide grants to community applicants for the creation of family resource centers or to provide grants to family resource centers for the continued operation of the centers through which services for vulnerable families, individuals, children, and youth who live in communities or in at-risk neighborhoods are accessible and coordinated through a single point of entry.

The department shall operate the family resource center program in accordance with the provisions of this part 1. In addition, the department may establish any other procedures necessary to implement the program, including establishing the procedure for submitting grant applications by community applicants seeking to establish a family resource center or by a family resource center applying for a grant for continued operation of a family resource center.

The family resource center program may receive direct appropriations from the state general fund.

Any money family resource centers receive pursuant to the temporary assistance for needy families block grant or from the family issues cash fund created in section 26-5.3-106 must be from funds directly disbursed by a county at the discretion of the county.

The department may accept and expend any grants from any public or private source for the purpose of making grants to community applicants for the establishment or continued operation of family resource centers and for the purpose of evaluating the effectiveness of the family resource center program. This part 1 does not prohibit a family resource center from accepting and expending funds received through an authorized contract, grants, or donations from public or private sources.

Services that a family resource center provides must be coordinated, and services should reflect the needs of the community and the resources available to support such programs and services. Services may be delivered directly to a family at the center by center staff or by providers who contract with or have provider agreements with the center. Any family resource center that provides direct services shall comply with applicable state and federal laws and regulations regarding the delivery of such services, unless required waivers or exemptions have been granted by the appropriate governing body.

Each family resource center shall provide case management by a family advocate who screens and assesses a family's needs and strengths. The family advocate shall then assist the family with setting its own goals and, together with the family, develop a written plan to pursue the family's goals in working toward a greater level of self-reliance or in attaining self-sufficiency. The plan must provide for the following:

A negotiated agreement that includes reciprocal responsibilities of the individual or family members and the personnel of each human service agency providing services to the family;

A commitment of resources as available and necessary to meet the family's plan;

The delivery of applicable services to the individual or family, if feasible, or referral to an appropriate service provider;

The coordination of services;

The monitoring of the progress of the family toward greater self-reliance or self-sufficiency and an evaluation of services provided; and

Assistance to the individual or family in applying for the children's basic health plan, medical assistance benefits, or other benefits.

In addition to services required by subsection (2)(b) of this section, the family resource center may provide for the direct delivery of or referral to a provider of the following six services:

Early childhood care and education, including programs that contribute to school readiness;

Family support and parent education;

Well-child checkups and basic health services;

Early intervention for identifying infants, toddlers, and preschoolers who are developmentally disabled in order to provide necessary services to such children;

Before and after school care; and

Programs for children and youth.

A family resource center may also provide services, including, but not limited to, the following:

Additional educational programs, such as mentoring programs for students in elementary, junior, and senior high schools; adult education and family literacy programs; and educational programs that link families with local schools and alternative educational programs, including links with boards of cooperative services;

Job skills training and self-sufficiency programs for adults and youth;

Social, health, mental health, and child welfare services and housing, homeless, food and nutrition, domestic violence support, recreation, and substance abuse services;

Outreach, education, and support programs, including programs aimed at preventing teen pregnancies and school dropouts and programs providing parent support and advocacy; and

Transportation services to obtain other services provided pursuant to this subsection (2).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 602, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-18-104 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-104. Selection of centers - grants.

The department may award a grant for the purpose of establishing a family resource center based on a plan submitted to the department by the applicant or for the continued operation of a family resource center. The plan must meet specific criteria that the department is authorized to set, but the criteria must include at least the following provisions:

Members of the community participate in the development and implementation of the family resource center;

The center is governed by a local advisory council comprised of community representatives such as:

Families living in the community;

Local public or private service provider agencies;

Local job skills training programs, if any;

Local governing bodies;

Local businesses serving families in the community; and

Local professionals serving families in the community;

The advisory council establishes rules concerning the operation of the family resource center, including provisions for staffing;

Services the family resource center provides are coordinated and tailored to the specific needs of individuals and families who live in the community;

The family resource center:

Promotes and supports, and does not supplant, successful individual and family functioning and increases the recognition of the importance of successful individuals and families in the community;

Contributes to the strength of family ties;

Establishes programs that focus on the needs of family members, such as preschool programs, family preservation programs, and teenage pregnancy prevention programs, and assists the individual or family in moving toward greater self-sufficiency;

Recognizes the diversity of families within the community;

Supports family stability and unity;

Treats families as partners in providing services;

Encourages intergovernmental cooperation and a community-based alliance between government and the private sector. This cooperation may include, but need not be limited to, the pooling of public and private funds available to state agencies upon appropriation or transfer by the general assembly.

Provides programs that reduce institutional barriers related to categorical funding and eligibility requirements;

Makes information regarding available resources and services readily accessible to individuals and families; and

Coordinates efforts of public and private entities to connect families to services and supports that encourage the development of early childhood and other family support systems; and

The family resource center coordinates the provision of services and pools the resources of providers of services to aid in funding and operating the center.

If the department determines, from any report submitted by a local advisory council or any other source, that the operation of a family resource center is not in compliance with this part 1 or any rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of this part 1, the department may impose sanctions, including termination of the grant.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 604, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-18-105 as it existed prior to 2022.